New Jersey, session 222, A2486.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The Director of the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury shall develop, and update as necessary to reflect current law, an online training program for the purpose of providing instruction on the process of filing and remitting State taxes, including, but not limited to, the corporation business tax imposed pursuant to P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-1 et seq.), the gross income tax imposed pursuant to N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq., and the sales and use tax imposed pursuant to P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-1 et seq.).  The training program shall be designed specifically for use by small businesses and micro-businesses and shall be made available, free of charge, on the Internet website of the Division of Taxation. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.